Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201660-316
Commercial motor vehicle, defined.

Commercial motor vehicle means any motor vehicle used or maintained for the transportation of persons or property for hire, compensation, or profit or designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of property and does not include farm trucks or public power district motor vehicles.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 16;

Laws 2016, LB783, § 3.
January 1, 2017